output.aff
SFX M N 86
SFX M   o           e          [^dtnl]o
SFX M   do          de         do
SFX M   to          te         to
SFX M   no          ne         no
SFX M   lo          le         lo
SFX M   o           a          i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           u          i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           am         i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           a          i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           ach        i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           om         i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           ami        i[aeou]..o
SFX M   o           a          [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           a          [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           u          [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           am         [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           ach        [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           om         [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           ami        [^i][aeiouy]..o
SFX M   o           a          [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           u          [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           am         [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           a          [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           ach        [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           om         [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           ami        [aeioruy]..o
SFX M   o           a          [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           a          [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           u          [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           am         [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           ach        [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           om         [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           ami        [^aaeeiiooruuyy]..o
SFX M   o           a          i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           u          i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           am         i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           a          i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           ach        i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           om         i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           ami        i[aeou].o
SFX M   o           a          [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           u          [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           am         [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           a          [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           ach        [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           om         [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           ami        [aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           a          [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           a          [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           u          [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           am         [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           ach        [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           om         [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   o           ami        [^aeioruy].o
SFX M   um          a          ium
SFX M   um          a          ium
SFX M   um          u          ium
SFX M   um          am         ium
SFX M   um          ach        ium
SFX M   um          om         ium
SFX M   um          ami        ium
SFX M   um          a          [^i]um
SFX M   um          a          [^i]um
SFX M   um          u          [^i]um
SFX M   um          am         [^i]um
SFX M   um          e          [^i]um
SFX M   um          ach        [^i]um
SFX M   um          om         [^i]um
SFX M   um          ami        [^i]um
SFX M   ko          ok         cko
SFX M   oko         ok         oko
SFX M   ko          k          sko
SFX M   lo          iel        [dst]lo
SFX M   lo          el         [aeiouy]slo
SFX M   no          ien        [kt]no
SFX M   eso         ies        leso
SFX M   eto         iet        [^g]eto
SFX M   nto         nt         nto
SFX M   esto        iest       [^ig]esto
SFX M   to          t          iesto
SFX M   vo          v          ovo
SFX M   vo          iev        tvo
SFX M   um          i          [ei]um
SFX M   um          ier        [^ei]um
SFX M   o           0          gesto
SFX M   o           0          geto

SFX S N 18
SFX S   e           a          .
SFX S   e           u          .
SFX S   e           i          .
SFX S   e           om         .
SFX S   e           ia         [^i][aeu]..e
SFX S   e           ia         [^i][aeu].e
SFX S   e           ia         [^oaeioulr]..e
SFX S   e           ia         [^oaeioulr].e
SFX S   e           a          i[aeu]..e
SFX S   e           a          i[aeu].e
SFX S   e           a          [oaeioulr]..e
SFX S   e           a          [oaeioulr].e
SFX S   e           i          re
SFX S   ece         iec        ece
SFX S   rdce        rdc        rdce
SFX S   e           iam        .
SFX S   e           iach       .
SFX S   e           ami        .

SFX V Y 7
SFX V   e           a          .
SFX V   e           u          .
SFX V   e           am         .
SFX V   ie          i          .
SFX V   e           ach        .
SFX V   ie          im         .
SFX V   e           ami        .

SFX A N 24
SFX A   a           ence       ca
SFX A   a           eniec      ca
SFX A   a           encom      ca
SFX A   a           encoch     ca
SFX A   a           encami     ca
SFX A   0           nce        uba
SFX A   0           niec       uba
SFX A   0           ncom       uba
SFX A   0           ncoch      uba
SFX A   0           ncami      uba
SFX A   a           ce         [^c]a
SFX A   a           iec        [^c]a
SFX A   a           com        [^c]a
SFX A   a           coch       [^c]a
SFX A   a           cami       [^c]a
SFX A   0           ta         .
SFX A   0           ta         .
SFX A   0           t          .
SFX A   0           tu         .
SFX A   0           tam        .
SFX A   0           ti         .
SFX A   0           tach       .
SFX A   0           tom        .
SFX A   0           tami       .
