output.dic
adjektivum/M
afrodiziakum/M
aktualizovanie/V
allegretto/M
aluvium/M
amonium/M
anestetikum/M
antibiotikum/M
apogeum/M
arcibiskupstvo/M
arciknieza/A
archivovanie/V
asyndeton/M
auticko/M
avizo/M
baba/A
babkarstvo/M
bagrovisko/M
banictvo/M
baranca/A
barbarstvo/M
batola/A
Bavorsko/M
bdenie/V
bendzo/M
bicisko/M
Bielorusko/M
bitie/V
blizna/A
bludisko/M
borovicie/V
bosoratstvo/M
bralo/M
bratstvo/M
brdce/S
brko/M
brumendo/M
Bulharsko/M
bylinkarstvo/M
Carlo/M
centrum/M
cepovanie/V
cesto/M
ciganca/A
cinzano/M
citoslovce/S
concertino/M
cukrovinkarstvo/M
cyklovanie/V
casopisectvo/M
cerieslo/M
certisko/M
cinidlo/M
clenenie/V
clenstvo/M
clovieca/A
cuchradlo/M
dasno/M
decenium/M
decko/M
dejstvo/M
delidlo/M
denominativum/M
desatorca/A
determinovanie/V
deuterium/M
dielce/S
dielektrikum/M
dieta/A
dietatko/M
dievca/A
direktorium/M
divadielko/M
dizajnerstvo/M
dobrodenie/V
dobrovolnictvo/M
dodavanie/V
dojca/A
dokazovanie/V
domnenie/V
doplnanie/NV
dorozumenie/V
dovolenie/V
dracisko/M
drazdenie/V
drievce/S
drzadlo/M
dupa/A
duplikovanie/V
dvojca/A
dvojciatko/M
Dzibutsko/M
eliminovanie/V
emigrantsstvo/M
Estonsko/M
fakturovanie/V
fanfaronstvo/M
ficurstvo/M
fluidum/M
formovanie/V
furtactvo/M
gangsterstvo/M
garantovanie/V
germanium/M
gramoradio/M
Guadeloupe/S
gumarstvo/M
hada/A
hajtmanstvo/M
handrkovanie/V
hladisko/M
hlasenie/V
Holandsko/M
holica/A
holuba/A
horenie/V
hradisko/M
hrozno/M
hubenie/V
husa/A
chapanie/NV
chlapa/A
chlapatko/M
chlapca/A
chuda/A
chytadlo/M
identifikovanie/V
inkognito/M
institucionalny/V
iskriste/S
jablcko/M
jahna/A
jachtarstvo/M
javorie/V
jazero/M
jelenca/A
Jezuliatko/A
jubileum/M
kambium/M
kamencie/V
kamzica/A
katechetstvo/M
klacadlo/M
klbko/M
kliknutie/V
knazstvo/M
knieza/A
kolbiste/S
koliesko/M
kompenzovanie/V
kompozitum/M
konica/A
konzilium/M
korculovanie/V
kosisko/M
kozla/A
kozliatko/A
kresielko/M
kreslenie/V
krmivo/M
krstna/A
krstniatko/A
kruzenie/V
kura/A
kurca/A
kurciatko/M
kvetenstvo/M
kvieta/A
kvilenie/NV
lajdactvo/M
lastovica/A
latifundium/M
lemovanie/V
leptadlo/M
levica/A
lezisko/M
lice/S
liecivo/M
lietanie/V
lisiactvo/M
lista/A
losica/A
lovisko/M
lupanie/V
Macedonsko/M
maca/A
makovnisko/M
maniactvo/M
mapovanie/V
maskulinum/M
mauzoleum/M
medvieda/A
medziposchodie/V
memorandum/M
Mexiko/M
mihnutie/V
milenium/M
mlada/A
mlato/M
mnozstvo/M
modelovanie/V
Moldavsko/M
morca/A
more/S
moridlo/M
mriezkovanie/V
mucidlo/M
mydlo/M
nabitie/V
nadchnutie/V
nadsenie/V
nahravanie/V
nakladisko/M
nakladiste/S
naliehanie/V
naplanovanie/V
narabanie/V
narusenie/V
nastupiste/S
nasytenie/V
natrium/M
navysenie/V
nedbajstvo/M
nedopatrenie/V
nemluvna/A
nervstvo/M
nicnerobenie/V
nosidlo/M
nufacisko/M
obetiste/S
objasnenie/V
obmedzenie/V
obracanie/V
obvazisko/M
obvaziste/S
obydlie/V
odblokovanie/NV
odbytiste/S
odhalovanie/V
odium/M
odkontrolovanie/V
odohranie/V
odovzdanie/V
odpracovanie/NV
odsolovanie/V
odstavca/A
odstatnenie/NV
ohladanie/NV
ohrozenie/NV
ochudobnenie/V
okience/S
okno/M
omeskanie/V
opatrovanie/V
opica/A
opium/M
opovrhnutie/V
oranie/V
orlica/A
osidlovanie/V
osivo/M
osla/A
osudie/V
osialenie/V
overovanie/V
ovinadlo/M
oznacenie/V
pachola/A
panca/A
pancatko/M
paranie/V
partnerstvo/M
paza/A
paza/A
pecivo/M
peletizovanie/V
periodikum/M
piano/M
pierce/S
piskanie/V
pismeno/M
planetarium/M
plece/S
plemeno/M
plnivo/M
plytvanie/V
pocudovanie/V
poddanstvo/M
podfarbenie/V
podlomenie/V
podnozie/V
podplacanie/V
podstenie/V
pohlavie/V
Pohronie/V
pochlebovacstvo/M
pokracovanie/V
pole/S
polo/M
polposchodie/V
pomyslenie/V
poobedie/V
poriecie/V
porodnictvo/M
posilnovanie/V
postihnutie/V
posliapanie/V
potkanca/A
potomstvo/M
Povazie/V
povolovanie/V
pozdravenie/V
pozvanie/V
pradeno/M
prasa/A
prasiatko/A
pravnuca/A
prazenie/V
prebijadlo/M
preciarknutie/V
predkolenie/V
predobedie/V
predradenie/V
predznamenanie/V
prehliadanie/V
prejavenie/V
prekrytie/V
premenovanie/V
prenasanie/V
prepnutie/V
preposstvo/M
prerozdelenie/V
preskusanie/V
pretazenie/V
prevracanie/V
prianie/V
pribuzenstvo/M
pridomie/V
prijimanie/V
prinasanie/V
prirodzenie/V
prislusenstvo/M
pristresie/V
prognozovanie/V
promile/S
prostrednictvo/M
prvaca/A
psica/A
publikum/M
puto/M
radio/M
ramienko/M
razcestie/V
rebelantstvo/M
rekomando/M
respektovanie/NV
rezbarstvo/M
richtarstvo/M
rodium/M
rozbitie/V
rozhodnutie/V
rozkolnictvo/M
rozlisovanie/V
rozmyslanie/NV
rozplodenie/V
rozsirovanie/V
rozvratnictvo/M
rozvrstvenie/V
Rusko/M
rytectvo/M
sadlo/M
samooplodnenie/V
samotarstvo/M
saranca/A
sebaobetovanie/V
sebaspytovanie/V
sebavzdelavanie/V
sedliactvo/M
semeniste/S
seno/M
schodiste/S
schovavanie/V
silactvo/M
skalisko/M
skielce/S
skladiste/S
skladovanie/V
sklo/M
skoncenie/V
skucanie/NV
slavianofilstvo/M
slnce/S
slonica/A
sloveso/M
sluchatko/M
Sobotiste/S
sokolica/A
solisko/M
sova/A
sovica/A
spakrucie/V
spisovatelstvo/M
splnenie/NV
spolucitenie/V
spoluvlastnictvo/M
spoznavanie/V
sprisahanie/V
srdce/S
srna/A
srnatko/M
srnca/A
stanovenie/V
stanoviste/S
staromilstvo/M
stavitelstvo/M
stlacenie/V
stolarstvo/M
strelivo/M
stretavanie/V
stupadlo/M
stupnovanie/V
sukennictvo/M
sukvetie/V
sutazenie/V
svatuskarstvo/M
svietidlo/M
salovanie/V
sarhovstvo/M
sestoro/M
sitie/V
skolnictvo/M
skvrna/A
slachtitelstvo/M
snurovanie/V
specifikum/M
srotovisko/M
standardizovanie/V
stena/A
streberstvo/M
stvrtstorocie/V
svagrovstvo/M
tabornictvo/M
tango/M
telefoto/M
telenie/NV
tema/A
temno/M
tesarstvo/M
tkanivo/M
tlmocnictvo/M
tonovanie/V
torium/M
trdlo/M
trhanie/V
trio/M
trojca/A
Turkmensko/M
tusenie/V
ubocie/V
ucilisko/M
uciliste/S
udrziavanie/V
ukazovadlo/M
ukladanie/V
umiestnenie/V
upisanie/V
upravnictvo/M
upravovanie/V
usilie/V
usmernenie/V
ustrojenie/V
utociste/S
uvadzanie/V
uvolnenie/V
uzemie/V
vademekum/M
vajce/S
varovanie/NV
vazalstvo/M
vegetarianstvo/M
velenie/V
velvyslanectvo/M
vetrisko/M
videnie/V
viederce/S
vino/M
vlasisko/M
vlca/A
vlnenie/V
vnuca/A
vodarenstvo/M
vozidlo/M
vrabca/A
vratenie/V
vrece/S
vtaca/A
vtacatko/M
vybranie/V
vydieranie/V
vyhladzovanie/V
vychvalovanie/V
vykladisko/M
vykladiste/S
vykopanie/V
vymazavanie/V
vynatie/V
vyplnenie/V
vyprodukovanie/V
vyriesenie/V
vyskusanie/V
vystavovanie/V
vystupiste/S
vysvetlovanie/V
vysivkarstvo/M
vytocenie/V
vyucenie/V
vyvrcholenie/V
vyzarovanie/V
vzoprenie/V
yterbium/M
zabezpecovanie/V
zabudovanie/V
zadlzenie/V
zahlavie/V
zahumnie/V
zajatie/V
zakutie/V
zameno/M
zamestnavanie/V
zanedbanie/V
zaokruhlovanie/NVY
zapasenie/V
zaplnenie/V
zarovnanie/V
zasunutie/V
zaskodnictvo/M
zauctovanie/V
zbieranie/V
zburanisko/M
zdravie/V
zemiakarstvo/M
zhromazdovanie/V
zlatko/M
zlepsenie/V
zlo/M
zmilovanie/V
znepokojenie/V
zobrazovanie/V
zoradiste/S
zoznamovanie/V
zrazadlo/M
zubadlo/M
zubrica/A
zuctovanie/V
zviera/A
zvladnutie/V
zvodidlo/M
zabca/A
zezlo/M
zicenie/V
ziena/A
zivocisstvo/M
zobraca/A
zrieba/A
